src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_PUNUO/XX_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** punuo:puno
!! Gradation split this 2024-08-19
+Der+Der/Rc+V: VR_PUNUO/XX_01 ;
:%^WGStem  V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-WEAK ;
!!?PSS-PRSPRC_ttAvU
!! INDPRSSG1, INDPRSSG2, INDPRSPL1, INDPRSPL2, INDPRSCONNEG_WEAK, INDPRTPL3_Ettih,
!! INDPRTCONNEGPL3_EttU, CONDPRSPL3_EttAs, IMPRT_kkA, PSS-PRSPRC_ttAvU
:%^WGStem V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;
:  V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-STRONG ;
:%^WGStem  V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ; ! weak grade with vowel retention kaččuo:kačoi
INF_A ;

LEXICON V_PUNUO-SG3 !!≈ * **@CODE@** punuo:puno
:%{back%}%^WGStem  V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%{back%}%^WGStem V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;
:%{back%}  V-VV_01_BACK_USUALLY-STRONG ;
:%{back%}%^WGStem  V-VV_01_BACK_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;
+Inf:%{back%}%>o K ;

! V1u

LEXICON V_VALUO !!≈ * **@CODE@** valuo:valu
!! Back vowel
:%{back%} V_VALUO/PYZYÖ_01 ;
LEXICON V_VALUO/PYZYÖ_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** valuo:valu
!! Gradation No
!! similar_to: V_PYZYÖ
+Der+Der/Rc+V: VR_VALUO/PYZYÖ ;
:%^WGStem  V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%^WGStem V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;
:  V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-STRONG ;
:%^WGStem  V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;
INF_A ;


LEXICON V_VALUO-SG3 !!≈ * **@CODE@** valuo:valu
:%{back%}%^WGStem  V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%{back%}%^WGStem V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;
:%{back%}  V-VV_01_BACK_USUALLY-STRONG ;
:%{back%}%^WGStem  V-VV_01_BACK_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;
+Inf:%{back%}%>o K ;

!LEXICON V_VALUO-3 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ valuo:valu
!:%{back%}%^WGStem  V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK ;
!:%{back%}%^WGStem V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;
!:%{back%}  V-VV_01_BACK_USUALLY-STRONG ;
!:%{back%}%^WGStem  V-VV_01_BACK_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;
!+Inf:%{back%}%>o K ;

LEXICON V_PYZYÖ !!≈ * **@CODE@** pyzyö:pyzy
!! Front vowel
:%{front%} V_VALUO/PYZYÖ_01 ;

LEXICON V_PYZYÖ-SG3 !!≈ * **@CODE@** pyzyö:pyzy
:%{front%}%^WGStem  V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%{front%}%^WGStem V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;
:%{front%}  V-VV_01_FRONT_USUALLY-STRONG ;
:%{front%}%^WGStem  V-VV_01_FRONT_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;
+Inf:%{front%}%>ö K ;

LEXICON V_PYZYÖ-3 !!≈ * **@CODE@** pyzyö:pyzy
:%{front%}%^WGStem  V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%{front%}%^WGStem V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;
:%{front%}  V-VV_01_FRONT_USUALLY-STRONG ;
:%{front%}%^WGStem  V-VV_01_FRONT_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;
+Inf:%{front%}%>ö K ;

!! -UO polysyllabic stem

LEXICON V_SUALISTUO !!≈ * **@CODE@** sualistuo:sualistu
!! Back vowel
:%{back%} V_SUALISTUO/PEZEVYÖ_01 ;
LEXICON V_PEZEVYÖ !!≈ * **@CODE@** sualistuo:sualistu
!! Front vowel
:%{front%} V_SUALISTUO/PEZEVYÖ_01 ;
LEXICON V_SUALISTUO/PEZEVYÖ_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** valuo:valu
!! Gradation Yes
!FIXME 2024-08-16 +Der+Der/Rc+V: VR_VALUO/PEZEVYÖ ;
:%^WGStem  V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%^WGStem V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;
:  V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-STRONG ; ! gives pezevynyh
:%^WGStem  V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;
ACT-PRFPRC_nnuH ; ! pezevynnyh, not pezevynyh
INF_A ;

! V1i
!! ie

LEXICON V_POTKIE !!≈ * **@CODE@** potkie:potki
!! Back vowel
:%{back%} V_POTKIE/EČČIE_01 ;
LEXICON V_POTKIE/EČČIE_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** potkie:potki
!! Gradation No
+Der+Der/Rc+V: VR_POTKIE/EČČIE_01 ;
:%^WGStem  V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%^WGStem V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;
:  V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-STRONG ;
:%^WGStem  V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ; !Ljudmila Markianova opii, ečii Aho: Juha
:%^RmVow  V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;
!! Ind+Prt+Sg3
INF_A ;

LEXICON V_POTKIE-SG3 !!≈ * **@CODE@** potkie:potki
:%{back%}%^WGStem  V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%{back%}%^WGStem V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;
:%{back%}  V-VV_01_BACK_USUALLY-STRONG ;
:%{back%}  V-VV_01_BACK_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;
+Inf:%{back%}%>e K ;

LEXICON V_EČČIE !!≈ * **@CODE@** eččie:ečči
!! Front vowel
:%{front%} V_POTKIE/EČČIE_01 ;

LEXICON V_LUGIE !!≈ * **@CODE@** lugie:luge
!! Back vowel
:%{back%} V_LUGIE/IMIE_01 ;
LEXICON V_LUGIE/IMIE_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** lugie:luge
!! Gradation Yes
:%^WGStem V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%^WGStem%^RmVow V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;
: V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-STRONG ;
:%^RmVow  V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;
INF_A ;

:%>e INDPRTPL3_ttih ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
!€# koske%>e%^WGStem%>ttih
!€0 koski0e00ttih
:%>e INDPRSPL3_tAh ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
!€# koske%>e%^WGStem%>t%{aä%}h
!€0 koski0e00tah
:%>e PSS-PRFPRC_ttU ;
!€# koske%>e%^WGStem%>tt%{uy%}
!€0 koski0e00tah

LEXICON V_IMIE !!≈ * **@CODE@** imie:ime
!! Gradation No
!! Front vowel
:%{front%} V_LUGIE/IMIE_01 ;

!LEXICON V_IMIE-SG3 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ imie:ime
!:%{front%} V_IMIE-SG3_01 ;
!LEXICON V_IMIE-SG3_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** imie:ime
!:%^WGStem V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK ;
!:%^WGStem%^RmVow V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;
!: V-VV_01_FRONT_USUALLY-STRONG ;
!:%^RmVow  V-VV_01_FRONT_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;
!+Inf:%>e K ;

LEXICON V_TUNDIE !!≈ * **@CODE@** tundie:tunde 
:%{back%} V_TUNDIE_01 ;
LEXICON V_TUNDIE_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** tundie:tunde 
!! Gradation Yes
!! Back vowel
:%^WGStem V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%^D2Z%^WGStem%^RmVow V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;
: V-VV_01_BACK_USUALLY-STRONG ;
:%^D2Z%^RmVow  V-VV_01_BACK_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;
INF_A ;

:%>e INDPRTPL3_ttih ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
:%>e INDPRSPL3_tAh ; !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
:%>e PSS-PRFPRC_ttU ;

!! -ie polysyllabic stem

LEXICON V_KULLEKSIE !!≈ * **@CODE@** kulleksie:kulleksi
:%^WGStem V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%^WGStem%^RmVow V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;
:  V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-STRONG ;!this gives incorrect nuh
:%^RmVow  V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;
:%^WGStem ACT-PRFPRC_nnUH ;
INF_A ;

!! ### Verbs ending jA/vA
!! The verb has only a vowel stem, which may be either weak or strong.

!! jA/vA monosyllabic stem

LEXICON V_JUVVA !!≈ * **@CODE@** juvva:jo
:%{back%} V_JUVVA_01 ;
LEXICON V_JUVVA_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** juvva:jo
:%>o V-VV_02_BACK_USUALLY-WEAK ;
: V-VV_02_BACK_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;	! join
:%>o V-VV_02_BACK_USUALLY-STRONG ;
:  V-VV_02_BACK_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;	! joi
: INDPRSPL3_vvah ;
+Inf:%>vva K ;

!: V-VV_JUVVA_02 ;

LEXICON V_MYVVÄ !!≈ * **@CODE@** myvvä:mö
:%{front%} V_MYVVÄ_01 ;
LEXICON V_MYVVÄ_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** myvvä:mö
:%>ö V-VV_02_FRONT_USUALLY-WEAK ;
: V-VV_02_FRONT_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;	! möin
:%>ö V-VV_02_FRONT_USUALLY-STRONG ;
:  V-VV_02_FRONT_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;	! möi
: INDPRSPL3_vväh ;
+Inf:%>vvä K ;

LEXICON V_KÄVVÄ !!≈ * **@CODE@** kävvä:käv
!+Act:%>y V-VV_02_FRONT_USUALLY-WEAK ;
+Act:%{front%}%>y INDPRSSG1 ;
+Act:%{front%}%>y INDPRSSG2 ;
+Act:%{front%}%>y INDPRSPL1_FRONT ;
+Act:%{front%}%>y INDPRSPL2_FRONT ;
+Act:%{front%}%>y INDPRSCONNEG ;
+Act:%{front%}%^V2U INDPRTPL3_dih     ;
+Act:%{front%}%^V2U INDPRTCONNEGPL3_Dy        ;
+Act:%{front%}%^V2U CONDPRSPL3_Däs ;

+Act:%{front%} V-VV_02_FRONT_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;     ! möin

!+Act:%>y V-VV_02_FRONT_USUALLY-STRONG ;
+Act:%{front%}%>y INDPRSSG3_FRONT ;

+Act:%{front%}%^V2U INDPRTCONNEG_nnyh         ;
+Act:%{front%}%^V2U CONDPRS_S_FRONT ;
+Act:%{front%}%^V2U CONDPRT_nnys ;
+Act:%{front%}%^V2U CONDPRTPL3_Dänys ;
+Act:%{front%}%^V2U POT_nnE_FRONT ;
+Act:%{front%}%^V2U POTPL3_Däneh ;
+Act:%{front%}%^V2U IMPRT_Gä ;
+Act:%{front%}%^V2U IMPRTPL3_Dähes ;
:%{front%}%^V2U ACT-PRSPRC_KERIÄJY ;
:%{front%}%^V2U ACT-PRFPRC_nnyH ;
:%{front%}%^V2U PSS-PRSPRC_Dävy ;
:%{front%}%^V2U PSS-PRFPRC_DU ;
:%{front%}%^V2U M-INF_FRONT          ;

+Act:%{front%}  V-VV_02_FRONT_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;  ! möi

!: INDPRSPL3_vväh ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%{front%}väh K	;
+Inf:%{front%}%>vä K ;

!+TYÄ: V-VV_02_FRONT  ;
!+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:yn K ;
!+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:yy K ;

LEXICON V_SUAJA !!≈ * **@CODE@** suaja:saa
:%{back%} V_SUAJA_01 ;
