src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs
blahoslovie+V:blahoslovi V_KULLEKSIE  "siunata" ;
bluaznavuo+V:bluaznavu V_SUALISTUO  "tyhmetä" ;
brizguo+V:brizgu V_VALUO  "pirskua" ;
diivie+V:diivi V_EČČIE  "ihmetellä" ;
dokažie+V:dokaži V_KULLEKSIE  "todistaa" ;
gostie+V:gosti V_POTKIE  "kyläillä" ;
guurie+V:guuri V_POTKIE-SG3  "tupruta" ;
hairehtuo+V:hairehtu V_SUALISTUO  "erehtyä" ;
heikkie+V:heikki V_EČČIE  "huhuilla" ;
heiluo+V:heilu V_VALUO  "heilua" ;
hellävyö+V:hellävy V_PEZEVYÖ  "tulla helläksi" ;
hiestyö+V:hiesty V_PYZYÖ  "hiota" ;
huoleksie+V:huoleksi V_KULLEKSIE  "varata" ;
hyväksyö+V:hyväksy V_PEZEVYÖ  "hyväksyä" ;
häibyö+V:häiby V_PYZYÖ  "häipyä" ;
itkie+V:itke V_IMIE  "itkeä" ;
iäneštyö+V:iänešty V_PEZEVYÖ  "ääntää" ;
iškie+V:iške V_IMIE  "iskeä" ;
jauhostuo+V:jauhostu V_SUALISTUO  "tulla jauhoiseksi" ;
jiähtyö+V:jiähty V_PYZYÖ  "jäähtyä" ;
jouduo+V:joudu V_VALUO  "joutua" ;
juvva+V:jo V_JUVVA  "juoda" ;
jyvie+V:jyve V_IMIE  "jyrsiä" ;
jyvie+V:juvi V_POTKIE  "jyrsiä" ;
jäyhtyö+V:jäyhty V_PYZYÖ  "jäähtyä" ;
kabadie+V:kabadi V_KULLEKSIE  "kiivetä" ;
kierie+V:kieri V_EČČIE  "" ;
kiihistyö+V:kiihisty V_PEZEVYÖ  "kiihtyä" ;
kilʼlʼuo+V:killu V_VALUO  "kiljua" ;
kohtustuo+V:kohtustu V_SUALISTUO  "tulla raskaaksi" ;
koskie+V:koske V_LUGIE  "koskea" ;
kuaznie+V:kuazni V_POTKIE  "teloittaa" ;
kulgie+V:kulge V_LUGIE  "kulkea" ;
kuohuo+V:kuohu V_VALUO  "kuohua" ;
kydie+V:kyde V_IMIE  "kyteä" ;
kyndžie+V:kyndži V_EČČIE  "kynsiä" ;
kytkie+V:kytke V_IMIE  "kytkeä" ;
kyzyö+V:kyzy V_PYZYÖ  "kysyä" ;
käskie+V:käske V_IMIE  "käskie" ;
kätkie+V:kätke V_IMIE  "kätkeä (varsinaiskarjala)" ;
kävvä+V:käv V_KÄVVÄ  "käydä" ;
laskie+V:laske V_LUGIE  "laskea" ;
lepsuo+V:lepsu V_VALUO  "heilua" ;
libevyö+V:libevy V_PEZEVYÖ  "tulla liukkaaksi" ;
liikehtie+V:liikehti V_KULLEKSIE  "liikehtie" ;
losnie+V:losni V_POTKIE  "kiiltää" ;
luadivuo+V:luadivu V_SUALISTUO  "päästä sopimukseen" ;
lugie+V:luge V_LUGIE  "laskea (lukumäärää)" ;
luobuo+V:luobu V_VALUO  "luopua" ;
luvva+V:lo V_JUVVA  "mättää" ;
lyvvä+V:lö V_MYVVÄ  "lyödä" ;
lyvvä+V:lö V_MYVVÄ  "lyödä" ;
lähtie+V:lähte V_IMIE  "lähteä" ;
läžie+V:läži V_EČČIE  "sairastaa" ;
mehtyö+V:mehty V_PYZYÖ  "vettyä" ;
munie+V:muni V_POTKIE  "munia" ;
myvvä+V:mö V_MYVVÄ  "myydä" ;
myvvä+V:mö V_MYVVÄ  "myydä" ;
märröittyö+V:märröitty V_PEZEVYÖ  "märkiä" ;
nuoleksie+V:nuoleksi V_KULLEKSIE  "nuoleksia" ;
nurguo+V:nurgu V_VALUO  "mankua" ;
nurmevuo+V:nurmevu V_SUALISTUO  "nurmettua" ;
näygyö+V:näygy V_PYZYÖ  "näkyä" ;
oppie+V:oppi V_POTKIE  "koettaa" ;
perie+V:peri V_EČČIE  "periä" ;
pimevyö+V:pimevy V_PEZEVYÖ  "pimetä" ;
polgie+V:polge V_LUGIE  "polkea" ;
ponnistuo+V:ponnistu V_SUALISTUO  "ponnistaa" ;
puakostie+V:puakosti V_KULLEKSIE  "pilata" ;
puskie+V:puske V_LUGIE  "puskea" ;
reššie+V:rešši V_EČČIE  "päättää" ;
ruahtie+V:ruahti V_POTKIE  "raatsia, myös: rahita" ;
ruostuo+V:ruostu V_VALUO  "ruostua" ;
rupištuo+V:rupištu V_SUALISTUO  "rypistyä" ;
rybie+V:rybe V_IMIE  "rypeä" ;
ryyppie+V:ryyppi V_EČČIE  "ryyppiä" ;
rämsistyö+V:rämsisty V_PEZEVYÖ  "lakastua" ;
räykkyö+V:räykky V_PYZYÖ  "haukkua" ;
sobie+V:sobi V_POTKIE  "olla sopiva" ;
sotkie+V:sotke V_LUGIE  "sekoittaa" ;
suaja+V:saa V_SUAJA  "saada omakseen" ;
suvva+V:so V_JUVVA  "suoda" ;
syvvä+V:sö V_MYVVÄ  "syödä" ;
säilyö+V:säily V_PYZYÖ  "säilyä" ;
särgie+V:särge V_IMIE  "pilkkoa" ;
tervavuo+V:tervavu V_SUALISTUO  "tervaantua" ;
toistuo+V:toistu V_VALUO  "toistua" ;
tundie+V:tunde V_TUNDIE  "tuntea" ;
tunduo+V:tundu V_VALUO-SG3  "tuntua" ;
tungie+V:tunge V_LUGIE  "tunkea" ;
tutkie+V:tutki V_POTKIE  "tutkia" ;
tuvva+V:to V_JUVVA  "tuoda" ;
tärpie+V:tärpi V_EČČIE  "tärvellä" ;
täydyö+V:täydy V_PYZYÖ-SG3  "tavata jhk (asti)" ;
udobrie+V:udobri V_KULLEKSIE  "lannoittaa" ;
unevuo+V:unevu V_SUALISTUO  "tulla uniseksi" ;
venävyö+V:venävy V_PEZEVYÖ  "venäläistyä" ;
vihmuo+V:vihmu V_VALUO-SG3  "sataa (vettä)" ;
vijoittuo+V:vijoittu V_SUALISTUO  "pilaantua" ;
viändyö+V:viändy V_PYZYÖ  "vääntyä" ;
väheksie+V:väheksi V_KULLEKSIE  "väheksyä" ;
yldyö+V:yldy V_PYZYÖ  "yltyä" ;
öntästyö+V:öntästy V_PEZEVYÖ  "kompastua" ;
čahluo+V:čahlo V_PUNUO-SG3  "kivistää" ;
čirknie+V:čirkni V_EČČIE  "raapaista" ;
štukatuurie+V:štukatuuri V_KULLEKSIE  "rapata" ;
šuštuo+V:šuštu V_VALUO  "väsyä" ;
žuarie+V:žuari V_POTKIE  "paistaa pannulla" ;
